Utah statutes.
63M-1-2003.   Creation of Business Development for Disadvantaged Rural Communities Restricted Account -- Interest -- Costs of administering the restricted account -- Deposit of certain money and interest into the General Fund.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund the Business Development for Disadvantaged Rural Communities Restricted Account.

(2)  The restricted account shall be funded by:

(a)  money appropriated to the account by the Legislature;

(b)  money received by the office as:

(i)  repayment of a loan that the board grants to an eligible county under this part; and

(ii)  interest on a loan described in Subsection (2)(b)(i); and

(c)  the interest described in Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The restricted account shall earn interest.

(b)  The interest described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be deposited into the account.

(4)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money and interest deposited into the restricted account in accordance with this section may be expended:

(a)  by the board to award grants or loans to eligible counties as provided in this part; and

(b)  to cover the costs of administering this part:

(i)  in an amount not to exceed $5,000 in any fiscal year; and

(ii)  including the costs of providing staff support to administer this part.

(5)  The Division of Finance shall deposit any money and interest in the restricted account on July 1, 2015, into the General Fund.

